Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Chapter 1. General Provisions
§ 49-1-43.1.
Conservation officers not subject to criminal liability for trespass when performing official duties.

A conservation officer may enter in or upon public or private lands or waters where game or fish are known to range in the performance of his duties to enforce the wildlife laws of the state and the conservation officer shall not be subject to criminal liability for trespass while performing such duties.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not authorize a conservation officer to engage in any conduct in violation of a person’s constitutional right against unreasonable searches and seizures nor expand or enlarge upon the powers and duties of a conservation officer as specifically provided for under Section 49-1-43.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 511, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 29, 2006.).

§ 49-1-44.
Powers and duties of conservation officers to apprehend certain violators.

In addition to the regulations of the commission and the statutes relating to protection and preservation of wildlife and the environment, conservation officers are hereby authorized to assist in the detection and apprehension of violators of the laws of this state which pertain to theft of cattle, to enforce and apprehend violators of the laws of this state which pertain to unauthorized dumping of garbage, obstructing streams and littering, as set forth specifically in Sections 97-15-13, 97-15-21, 97-15-23, 97-15-25, 97-15-27, 97-15-29, 97-15-31, 97-15-39, 97-15-41, 97-15-43, 97-15-45, 97-17-53, 97-17-79, 97-17-81 and 97-17-83, but not limited thereto, and in addition to any other powers and duties otherwise delegated or assigned to conservation officers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 569, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 592, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 49-1-45.
Publication of rules, regulations and orders.

Rules, regulations and orders of the commission shall be published in accordance with the “Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5846; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 2006, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2006.).

§ 49-1-47.
Commission may execute deeds to clear up ambiguities in conveyances to it.

The commission is hereby authorized to execute and deliver deeds or other documents to make clear any ambiguity that may exist in any deed or conveyance to it, or to make the deed or conveyance to the commission conform to the intent of the parties as to the estate or rights or easements conveyed. Such deeds or documents shall be based upon an order of the commission setting forth the facts, shall be submitted to and approved by the Attorney General and executed and delivered for the commission by the director.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5912-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 470, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-1-49.
Cooperation with other departments.

The commission is hereby authorized to, and shall cooperate with the several state departments and officials in the conduct of matters in which the interest of the respective departments or officials overlap.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5845; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-1-51.
Funds.

All funds collected by the department under this chapter shall be used by the commission for the purpose of carrying out all purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5862; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 221; Laws, 1938, ch. 178; Laws, 1948, ch. 25, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-1-53.
Offices; supplies.

The department may, with any funds owned by it, purchase equipment and/or office furnishings sufficient to carry on its work; and, if the Department of Finance and Administration cannot assign suitable offices for the department in either of the state capitols, in the city of Jackson, then the Department of Finance and Administration shall rent suitable offices to properly house the department which shall then be authorized to pay such rental out of any of its funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5911; Laws, 1934, ch. 284; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-1-55.
Natural Science Museum.

The Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks’ Mississippi Museum of Natural Science is hereby designated as Mississippi’s official State Natural Science Museum.

The museum will henceforth be named “Mississippi Museum of Natural Science, The Fannye A. Cook Memorial, a Division of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.”

The Legislature shall annually appropriate from the General Fund a sum to defray not less than one hundred percent (100%) of the expenses of the museum.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5928.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 309, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1977, ch. 356; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-1-57.
Assent to federal program for promotion of hunter safety, principles of conservation and sportsmanship.

The State of Mississippi hereby assents to the provisions of the Act of Congress entitled, “An Act to Revise and Clarify the Federal Aid in Wildlife Restoration Act and the Federal Aid in Fish Restoration Act,” approved October 23, 1970 (Public Law 91-503, 91st Congress). The department may:

Establish a hunter safety conservation and sportsmanship program;

Apply for, receive and expend funds from any source for this program; and

Discharge any other duties, responsibilities and powers as are necessary to implement the program.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5844-13; Laws, 1972, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 409, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 49-1-59.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1995, ch. 409, § 6, effective from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

[Codes, 1942, § 5844-14; Laws, 1972, ch. 314, § 2]

§ 49-1-60.
Insurance covering hunter safety program.

The department is hereby authorized to purchase liability insurance to cover the following:

Any officer in charge and control of an armory used for firearm instruction in the State of Mississippi, as a part of the Mississippi Hunter Safety Program;

Any Mississippi certified hunter and firearm instructor, while participating in the Mississippi Hunter Safety Program; and

Any student participating in hunter safety courses sponsored by the department’s Hunter Safety Program and being taught by a hunter safety instructor certified by the department’s Hunter Safety Program.

The premium for such liability insurance shall be paid from the Fisheries and Wildlife Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 524, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 365, § 5; Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 52; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 33; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 34; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 31; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 30; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 31; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 30; Laws, 1992, ch. 491 § 32; Laws, 1995, ch. 409, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§§ 49-1-61 through 49-1-63.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1995, ch. 409, §§ 7-9, effective from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§49-1-61. [Codes, 1942, § 5844-15; Laws, 1972, ch. 314, § 3]

§49-1-62. [En Laws, 1976, ch. 383, § 2]

§49-1-63. [Codes, 1942, § 5844-16; Laws, 1972, ch. 314, § 4]

§ 49-1-65.
Hunter Education and Training Program Fund.

Any assessments collected under subsection (3) of Section 99-19-73 shall be deposited in a special fund hereby created in the State Treasury and designated the “Hunter Education and Training Program Fund,” which shall be expended to defray the expenses of the program as authorized and appropriated by the Legislature. In addition, the Legislature shall annually appropriate from the General Fund a sum to defray the necessary expenses of the program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 383, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 384, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 365, § 6; Laws, 1990, ch. 329, § 9; Laws, 1995, ch. 409, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).